Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.290

Decree of adoption—Duties of state registrar of vital statistics.

Upon receipt of a decree of adoption, the state registrar of vital statistics shall:

(1) Return the decree to the court clerk if all information required by RCW 26.33.250 is not included in the decree;

(2) If the adoptee was born in a state other than Washington, or in a territory of the United States, forward the certificate of adoption to the appropriate health record recording agency of the state or territory of the United States in which the birth occurred;

(3) If the adoptee was born outside of the United States or its territories, issue a new certificate of birth by the office of the state registrar of vital statistics which reflects the information contained in the decree.

[ 1984 c 155 s 29.]

NOTES:

Vital statistics: Chapter 70.58A RCW.